Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 2 Commercial Feeds

4-2-1.
Title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Commercial Feed Law of 1977”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-2.
Enforcing official.

This chapter shall be administered by the director of the department of environmental management of the state or his or her authorized agent, referred to as the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter:

“Brand name” means any word, name, symbol, or device, or any combination identifying the commercial feed of a distributor or registrant and distinguishing it from that of others.

“Commercial feed” means all materials except whole seeds unmixed or physically altered entire unmixed seeds, when not adulterated within the meaning of §

4-2-7

, which are distributed for use as feed or for mixing in feed. The director by regulation may exempt from this definition, or from specific provisions of this chapter, commodities such as hay, straw, stover, silage, cobs, husks, hulls, and individual chemical compounds or substances when those commodities, compounds, or substances are not inter-mixed or mixed with other materials, and are not adulterated within the meaning of §

4-2-7

.

“Contract feeder” means a person who as an independent contractor, feeds commercial feed to animals pursuant to a contract whereby that commercial feed is supplied, furnished, or otherwise provided to that person and whereby that person’s remuneration is determined all or in part by feed consumption, mortality, profits, or amount or quality of product.

“Customer formula feed” means commercial feed which consists of a mixture of commercial feeds and/or ingredients each batch of which is manufactured according to the specific instructions of the final purchaser.

“Distribute” means to offer for sale, sell, exchange, or barter, commercial feed; or to supply, furnish, or otherwise provide commercial feed to a contract feeder.

“Distributor” means any person who distributes.

“Drug” means any article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in animals other than humans and articles other than feed intended to affect the structure or any function of the animal body.

“Feed ingredient” means each of the constituent materials making up a commercial feed.

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon or affixed to the container in which a commercial feed is distributed, or on the invoice or delivery slip with which a commercial feed is distributed.

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter:

Upon a commercial feed or any of its containers or wrapper; or

Accompanying that commercial feed.

“Manufacture” means to grind, mix, or blend, or further process a commercial feed for distribution.

“Mineral feed” means a commercial feed intended to supply primarily mineral elements or inorganic nutrients.

“Official sample” means a sample of feed taken by the director or his or her agent in accordance with §

4-2-10(c)

, (e), or (f).

“Percent” or “percentages” means percentages by weights.

“Person” means individual, partnership, corporation, and association.

“Pet” means any domesticated animal normally maintained in or near the household(s) of the owner(s).

“Pet food” means any commercial feed prepared and distributed for consumption by pets.

“Product name” means the name of the commercial feed which identifies it as to kind, class, or specific use.

“Specialty pet” means any domesticated animal pet normally maintained in a cage or tank, such as, but not limited to, gerbils, hamsters, canaries, psittacine birds, mynahs, finches, tropical fish, goldfish, snakes and turtles.

“Specialty pet food” means any commercial feed prepared and distributed for consumption by specialty pets.

“Ton” means a net weight of two thousand (2,000) pounds avoirdupois.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-4.
Registration.

No person shall manufacture a commercial feed in this state, unless he or she has filed with the director on forms provided by the director, his or her name, place of business and location of each manufacturing facility in this state.

No person shall distribute in this state a commercial feed except a customer formula feed, which has not been registered pursuant to this section. The application for registration, accompanied by a sixty dollar ($60.00) per brand registration fee, shall be submitted in the manner prescribed by the director, on forms furnished by the director. A tag, label, or facsimile for each brand to be registered must accompany the application. Upon approval by the director, the registration shall be issued to the applicant. All registrations expire on the 31st day of December of each year.

The director is empowered to refuse registration of any commercial feed not in compliance with this chapter and to cancel any registration subsequently found not to be in compliance with any provisions of this chapter provided, that no registration shall be refused or canceled unless the registrant has been given an opportunity to be heard before the director and to amend his or her application in order to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

Changes of either chemical or ingredient composition of a registered commercial feed may be permitted with no new registration required provided there is satisfactory evidence that those changes would not result in a lowering of the guaranteed analysis of the product for the purpose for which designed, and provided a new label is submitted to the director notifying the director of the change.

All moneys received by the director under this chapter shall be deposited as general revenues and shall consist of all fertilizer registration and tonnage fees paid pursuant to §§

2-7-4

and

2-7-6

and fees paid pursuant to §

4-2-4

.

All moneys appropriated for the feed and fertilizer quality testing program shall be made available for the following purposes:

To support the feed and fertilizer testing laboratory for the testing and analysis of commercial feeds distributed within this state for the expressed purpose of detection of deficiency.

For payment of ancillary services, personnel and equipment incurred in order to carry out the purposes of quality assurance defined by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 349, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 22, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 33, § 2.

4-2-5.
Labeling.

A commercial feed shall be labeled as follows:

In the case of a commercial feed, except a customer formula feed, it shall be accompanied by a label bearing the following information:

The net weight.

The product name and the brand name, if any, under which the commercial feed is distributed.

The guaranteed analysis stated in any terms that the director by regulation requires to advise the user of the composition of the feed or to support claims made in the labeling. In all cases, the substances or elements must be determinable by laboratory methods such as the method published by the association of official analytical chemists (AOAC).

The common or usual name of each ingredient used in the manufacture of the commercial feed. The director by regulation may permit the use of a collective term for a group of ingredients which perform a similar function, or he or she may exempt any commercial feeds, or any group of commercial feeds, from the requirement of an ingredient statement if he or she finds that this statement is not required in the interest of consumers.

The name and principal mailing address of the manufacturer or the person responsible for distributing the commercial feed.

Adequate directions for use for all commercial feeds containing drugs and for any other feeds as the director may require by regulation as necessary for their safe and effective use.

Any precautionary statement that the director by regulation determines is necessary for the safe and effective use of the commercial feed.

In the case of a customer formula feed, it shall be accompanied by a label, invoice, delivery slip, or other shipping document, bearing the following information:

Name and address of the manufacturer.

Name and address of the purchaser.

Date of delivery.

The product name and brand name, if any, and the net weight of each registered commercial feed used in the mixture, and the net weight of each other ingredient used.

Adequate directions for use for all customer formula feeds containing drugs and for any other feeds as the director may require by regulation as necessary for their safe and effective use.

Any precautionary statements that the director by regulation determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the customer formula feed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-6.
Misbranding.

A commercial feed is deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.

If it is distributed under the name of another commercial feed.

If it is not labeled as required in §

4-2-5

.

If it purports to be or is represented as a commercial feed, or it purports to contain or is represented as containing a commercial feed ingredient, unless that commercial feed or feed ingredient conforms to the definition, if any, prescribed by regulation by the director.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed with the conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in the labeling) and in the terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-7.
Adulteration.

A commercial feed is deemed to be adulterated:

If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not an added substance, the commercial feed shall not be considered adulterated under this subsection if the quantity of that substance in the commercial feed does not ordinarily render it injurious to health.

If it bears or contains any added poisonous, added deleterious, or added nonnutritive substance which is unsafe within the meaning of § 406 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 346), other than one which is:

A pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity; or

A food additive.

If it is, or it bears or contains any food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of § 409 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 348).

If it is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains a pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of § 408(a) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 346a(a)). Where a pesticide chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or a tolerance prescribed under § 408 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 346a) and that raw agricultural commodity has been subject to processing such as canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling, the residue of that pesticide chemical remaining in or on that processed feed is not deemed unsafe if that residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity has been removed to the extent possible in good manufacturing practice and the concentration of that residue in the processed feed is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity unless the feeding of that processed feed will result or is likely to result in a pesticide residue in the edible product of the animal, which is unsafe within the meaning of § 408(a) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 346a(a)).

If it is, or it bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of § 706 of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 376).

If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or abstracted from the feed or any less valuable substance substituted.

If its composition or quality falls below or differs from that which it is purported or is represented to possess by its labeling.

If it contains a drug and the methods used in or the facilities or controls used for its manufacture, processing, or packaging do not conform to current good manufacturing practice regulations promulgated by the director to assure that the drug meets the requirement of this chapter as to safety and has the identity and strength and meets the quality and purity characteristics which it purports or is represented to possess. In promulgating those regulations, the director shall adopt the current good manufacturing practice regulations for medicated feed premixes and for medicated feeds established under authority of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), unless he or she determines that they are not appropriate to the conditions which exist in this state.

If it contains viable weed seeds in amounts exceeding the limits which the director shall establish by rule or regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-8.
Prohibited acts.

The following acts and the causing of these acts within the state are prohibited:

The manufacture or distribution of any commercial feed that is adulterated or misbranded.

The adulteration or misbranding of any commercial feed.

The distribution of agricultural commodities such as whole seed, hay, straw, stover, silage, cobs, husks, and hulls, which are adulterated within the meaning of §

4-2-7

.

The removal or disposal of a commercial feed in violation of an order under §

4-2-11

.

The failure or refusal to register in accordance with §

4-2-4

.

Failure to file any report required by this chapter or the regulations promulgated under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-9.
Rules and regulations.

The director is authorized to make appropriate regulations requiring the maintenance of records, as may be deemed necessary, setting forth the number of net tons of commercial feed distributed in the state. The director has the right to examine any records to verify statements of tonnage.

The director is authorized to promulgate any rules and regulations for commercial feeds and pet foods that are specifically authorized in this chapter and any other reasonable rules and regulations necessary for the efficient enforcement of this chapter. In the interest of uniformity the director shall by regulation adopt, unless he or she determines that they are inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter or are not appropriate to conditions which exist in this state, the following:

The official definitions of feed ingredients and official feed terms adopted by the association of American feed control officials and published in the official publication of that organization; and

Any regulations promulgated pursuant to the authority of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.); provided, that the director would have the authority under this chapter to promulgate those regulations.

Before the issuance, amendment, or repeal of any rule or regulation authorized by this chapter, the director shall publish the proposed regulation, amendment, or notice to repeal an existing regulation in a manner reasonably calculated to give interested parties, including all current registrants, adequate notice and shall afford all interested persons an opportunity to present their views, orally or in writing, within a reasonable period of time. After consideration of all views presented by interested persons, the director shall take appropriate action to issue the proposed rule or regulation or to amend or to repeal an existing rule or regulation. The provisions of this subsection notwithstanding, if the director, pursuant to the authority of this chapter, adopts the official definition of feed ingredients or official feed terms as adopted by the association of American feed control officials, or regulations promulgated pursuant to the authority of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), any amendment or modification adopted by the association of American feed control officials or by the secretary of human services in the case of regulations promulgated pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), shall be adopted automatically under this chapter without regard to the publication of the notice required by this subsection unless the director, by order, specifically determines that the amendment or modification shall not be adopted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-10.
Inspection, sampling, and analysis.

For the purpose of enforcement of this chapter, and in order to determine whether its provisions have been complied with, including whether or not any operations may be subject to those provisions, officers or employees designated by the director, upon presenting appropriate credentials, and a written notice to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, are authorized:

To enter, during normal business hours, any factory, warehouse, or establishment within the state in which commercial feeds are manufactured, processed, packed, or held for distribution, or to enter any vehicle being used to transport or hold those feeds; and

To inspect at reasonable times and within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner the factory, warehouse, establishment, or vehicle and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers, and labeling. The inspection may include the verification of only those records, and production and control procedures as may be necessary to determine compliance with the good manufacturing practice regulations established under §

4-2-9(a)

.

A separate notice shall be given for each inspection, but a notice shall not be required for each entry made during the period covered by the inspection. Each inspection shall be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness. Upon completion of the inspection, the person in charge of the facility or vehicle shall be so notified.

If the officer or employee making the inspection of a factory, warehouse, or other establishment has obtained a sample in the course of the inspection upon completion of the inspection and prior to leaving the premises he or she shall give to the owner, operator, or agent in charge a receipt describing the samples obtained.

If the owner of any factory, warehouse, or establishment described in subsection (a), or the owner’s agent, refuses to admit the director or the director’s agent to inspect in accordance with subsections (a) and (b), the director is authorized to obtain from the attorney general a warrant directing the owner or the owner’s agent to submit the premises described in the warrant to inspection.

For the purpose of the enforcement of this chapter, the director or the director’s designated agent is authorized to enter upon public or private premises including any vehicle of transport during regular business hours to have access to, and obtain samples, and to examine records relating to distribution of commercial feeds.

Sampling and analysis shall be conducted in accordance with methods published by the association of official analytical chemists, or in accordance with other generally recognized methods.

The results of all analysis of official samples shall be forwarded by the director to the person named on the label and to the purchaser. When the inspection and analysis of an official sample indicates a commercial feed has been adulterated or misbranded and upon request within thirty (30) days following receipt of the analysis the director shall furnish to the registrant a portion of the sample concerned.

The director, in determining for administrative purposes whether a commercial feed is deficient in any component, shall be guided by the official sample as defined in §

4-2-3(13)

and obtained and analyzed as provided for in subsections (c), (e), and (f) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-11.
Withdrawal, condemnation, and confiscation of commercial feeds.

Withdrawal from distribution orders. When the director or the director’s authorized agent has reasonable cause to believe any lot of commercial feed is being distributed in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any of the prescribed regulations under this chapter, he or she may issue and enforce a written or printed withdrawal from distribution order, warning the distributor not to dispose of the lot of commercial feed in any manner until written permission is given by the director or the court. The director shall release the lot of commercial feed so withdrawn when those provisions and regulations have been complied with. If compliance is not obtained within thirty (30) days, the director may begin, or upon request of the distributor or registrant shall begin, proceedings for condemnation.

Condemnation and confiscation. Any lot of commercial feed not in compliance with those provisions and regulations shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the director to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the commercial feed is located. In the event the court finds the commercial feed is in violation of this chapter and orders the condemnation of that commercial feed, it shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the commercial feed and the laws of the state. In no instance shall the disposition of the commercial feed be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the commercial feed or for permission to process or relabel the commercial feed to bring it into compliance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-12.
Penalties.

Any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or who impedes, hinders, or otherwise prevents, or attempts to prevent, the director or his or her authorized agent in performance of his or her duty in connection with the provisions of this chapter shall be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor and be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than two hundred dollars ($200) for the first violation, and not less than two hundred dollars ($200) or more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent violation.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director or the director’s representative to:

Report for prosecution;

Institute seizure proceedings; or

Issue a withdrawal from distribution order, as a result of minor violations of the chapter, or when he or she believes the public interest will best be served by suitable notice of warning in writing.

It shall be the duty of the attorney general to whom any violation is reported to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction without delay. Before the director reports violations for prosecution, an opportunity shall be given the distributor to present his or her view to the director.

The director is authorized to apply for and the court to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under the chapter notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. The injunction shall be issued without bond.

Any person adversely affected by an act, order, or ruling made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may within forty-five (45) days bring action in superior court in the county where the enforcement official has his or her office for judicial review of those actions. The form of the proceeding is any which may be provided by the statutes of this state to review decisions of administrative agencies, or in the absence or inadequacy of a form of proceeding, any applicable form of legal action, including actions for declaratory judgments or writs or prohibitory or mandatory injunctions.

Any person who uses to his or her own advantage, or reveals to other than the director, or the director’s authorized agent(s), or to the courts when relevant in any judicial proceeding, any information acquired under the authority of this chapter, concerning any method, records, formulations, or processes which as a trade secret is entitled to protection, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall on conviction be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than one year or both. This prohibition shall not be deemed as prohibiting the director, or his or her authorized agent(s), from exchanging information of a regulatory nature with appointed officials of the United States government, or of other states, who are similarly prohibited by law from revealing this information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-13.
Cooperation with other entities.

The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states, agencies of the federal government, and private associations in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-14.
Publication of information.

The director shall publish at least annually, in any forms that he or she may deem proper, information he or she may consider advisable, and a report of the results of the analyses of official samples of commercial feeds sold within the state as compared with the analyses guaranteed in the registration and on the label. The information concerning production and use of commercial feed shall not disclose the operations of any person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-15.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this chapter shall for any reason be judged invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the chapter but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of the chapter directly involved in the controversy in which that judgment has been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 170, § 2.

4-2-16 — 4-2-18.
Repealed.